test/src/morphology/mrj1933-test-N-mu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - мӱ: # Noun '??'
     мӱ+N+Sg+Nom: мӱ
     мӱ+N+Sg+Gen: мӱн
     мӱ+N+Sg+Dat: мӱлӓн
     мӱ+N+Sg+Acc: мӱм
     мӱ+N+Sg+Lat: мӱш
     мӱ+N+Sg+Ill: мӱшкӹ
     мӱ+N+Sg+Ine: мӱштӹ
     мӱ+N+Sg+Com: мӱге
     мӱ+N+Sg+Abe: мӱде
     мӱ+N+Sg+Cmp: мӱлӓ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Nom: мӱвлӓ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Gen: мӱвлӓн
     мӱ+N+Pl+Dat: мӱвлӓлӓн
     мӱ+N+Pl+Acc: мӱвлӓм
     мӱ+N+Pl+Lat: мӱвлӓш
     мӱ+N+Pl+Ill: мӱвлӓшкӹ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Ine: мӱвлӓштӹ
     мӱ+N+Pl+Com: мӱвлӓге
     мӱ+N+Pl+Abe: мӱвлӓде
     мӱ+N+Pl+Cmp: мӱвлӓлӓ

#мӱт, мӱэт, мӱэтшӹ, 
#мӱжӹ, 
###
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: мӱэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: мӱэмӹн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: мӱэмлӓн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: мӱэмӹм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: мӱэшэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ill: мӱшкэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ine: мӱштэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: мӱэмгэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abe: мӱэмтэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cmp: мӱэмлӓ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: мӱвлӓэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: мӱвлӓэмӹн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: мӱвлӓэмлӓн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: мӱвлӓэмӹм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: мӱвлӓэшэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ill: мӱвлӓшкэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ine: мӱвлӓштэм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: мӱвлӓэмгэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: мӱвлӓэмтэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cmp: мӱвлӓэмлӓ

###
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: мӱэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: мӱэдӹн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: мӱэтлӓн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: мӱэдӹм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: мӱэшэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ill: мӱшкэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ine: мӱштэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: мӱэткэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abe: мӱэттэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cmp: мӱэтлӓ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: мӱвлӓэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: мӱвлӓэдӹн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: мӱвлӓэтлӓн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: мӱвлӓэдӹм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: мӱвлӓэшэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ill: мӱвлӓшкэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ine: мӱвлӓштэт
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: мӱвлӓэткэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abe: мӱвлӓэттэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cmp: мӱвлӓэтлӓ
###
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: мӱжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: мӱжӹн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: мӱжӹлӓн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: мӱжӹм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: мӱэшӹжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ill: мӱшкӹжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ine: мӱштӹжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: мӱжӹгэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abe: мӱжӹтэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cmp: мӱжӹлӓ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: мӱвлӓжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: мӱвлӓӹн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: мӱвлӓжӹлӓн
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: мӱвлӓэдӹм
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: мӱвлӓэшӹжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ill: мӱвлӓшкӹжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ine: мӱвлӓштӹжӹ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: мӱвлӓжӹгэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abe: мӱвлӓжӹтэ
     мӱ+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cmp: мӱвлӓжӹлӓ
